Utah statutes.
54-8-20.   Assessments -- Failure to pay installment -- Interest and
penalties -- Lien on property -- Sale of property -- Disposition of proceeds.
The failure to pay any installment and any interest thereon when due shall
ipso facto cause all other installments and the interest thereon to become due
and payable and the governing body shall, within 30 days from the date of such
default, proceed against the property for the collection of the total amount
due thereon, including interest plus 10% additional on unpaid principal and
interest as penalties and costs of collection. Special assessments levied
hereunder shall rank on an equality with taxes levied against the property
assessed by the state, the county and all other taxing districts, and no sale
of property for the nonpayment of taxes or other special assessments shall
extinguish the lien of other than the taxes or special assessments for the
nonpayment of which such sale is had. The proceeds of the sale of any property
for nonpayment of special assessments shall be applied in the discharge of
such assessments, the interest thereon, costs and penalties. If there are
outstanding any special improvement bonds issued pursuant to the improvement
in question, proceeds of the sale of any property for nonpayment of any
special assessments shall after the payment therefrom of the costs of
collection be applied to the costs of redemption prior to maturity of as many
of the outstanding special improvement bonds as can be retired with the amount
available. Any surplus remaining after the payment of amounts due shall be
paid over to the owner of the property sold. The lien of special assessments
levied hereunder shall be superior to all other liens against the property
assessed except that it shall be on a parity with the lien of ad valorem taxes
and a lien of other special assessments and shall be effective from and after
the date upon which the resolution levying the assessments is adopted.
